Hawaii statutes.
§521-38 Tenants subject to rental
agreement; notice of conversions. When a period of tenancy is pursuant to
any rental agreement and where a landlord contemplates conversion to a condominium
property regime under chapter 514A or 514B, the landlord shall provide notice
to the tenant at least one hundred twenty days in advance of the termination of
the rental agreement. [L 1980, c 189, §1; am L 1981, c 211, §1; am L 1985, c
164, §5; am L 1988, c 65, §2; am L 2004, c 164, §24; am L 2008, c 28, §18]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next